Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 25.1 Criminal Royalties

12-25.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Criminal Royalties Distribution Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Alleged criminally responsible person” means a person who has been indicted or against whom a criminal information has been proferred for the commission of a felony committed within the state of Rhode Island which caused another person to suffer personal injury or loss of property, but who has not yet been either convicted or acquitted of the charge nor had the charge dismissed.

“Child” means an unmarried person who is under eighteen (18) years of age and includes a stepchild or an adopted child.

“Commercial exploitation” means any significant commercial exploitation by means of any publication, reenactment, dramatization, interview, depiction, explanation, or expression through any medium of communication which is undertaken for financial consideration, except tangential and incidental references to a crime. The term includes, but is not limited to, a movie, book, magazine or newspaper article, tape recording, still photograph, radio or television program, live presentation, or reproduction or presentation of any kind.

“Convicted,” as used in this chapter only, means a person who has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of a felony offense, regardless of the fine, sentence or other punishment imposed or who has been found guilty after a trial on a charge of a felony offense.

“Court” means the superior court.

“Criminally responsible person” means a person who has been convicted of a felony committed within the state of Rhode Island which caused another person to suffer personal injury or loss of property, or who has been adjudicated not guilty by reason of insanity after a trial on a charge of the offense, or who has voluntarily admitted the commission of the offense.

“Dependent” means a person wholly or partially dependent upon the income of the victim at the time of his or her death or would have been so dependent but for the incapacity due to the injury from which the death resulted, and includes a child of the victim born after the death of the victim.

“Pecuniary loss” includes:

For personal injury:

Medical expenses (including psychiatric care);

Hospital expenses;

Loss of past earnings; and

Loss of future earnings because of a disability resulting from personal injury;

For death:

Funeral and burial expenses; and

Loss of support to the dependents of the victim; and

Any other expenses actually and necessarily incurred as a result of the personal injury or death.

“Personal injury” means actual bodily harm, mental or nervous shock, or a pregnancy.

“Relative” means a spouse, parent, grandparent, stepfather, stepmother, child, grandchild, brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, and a spouse’s parents.

“Victim” means a person who suffers personal injury or loss of property as a direct result of the conduct of another person in perpetration of a criminal offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 240, § 1.

12-25.1-3.
Confiscation of criminal royalties — Criminal royalties fund — Priority of claims against criminal royalties fund.

Every person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity contracting with a criminally responsible person, alleged criminally responsible person, or with the legal representative or assignee of the person regarding the commercial exploitation of the events and circumstances constituting and/or surrounding and/or motivating the crime or alleged crime shall submit a copy of the contract, within ten (10) days of the making of the contract, to the general treasurer and shall pay over to the general treasurer, within ten (10) days of it becoming due and payable, any and all monies or other compensation which would otherwise by the terms of the contract be due and payable to or distributed at the direction of that person. All rights, causes of action, or other entitlements accruing to any criminally responsible person, alleged criminally responsible person, or the legal representative or assignee of the person for the commercial exploitation shall inure to and be enforceable by the general treasurer for the benefit of the criminal royalties fund established by this chapter.

All monies paid to or recovered by the general treasurer pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be collectively known as the “criminal royalties fund.” Except as required for payment of awards under this chapter, the general treasurer shall manage and invest the criminal royalties fund in accordance with §

35-10-11

.

Claims against any portion of the criminal royalties fund attributable to a specific criminally responsible person shall have the following priorities:

Claims by the state for costs incurred in providing defense counsel for the criminally responsible person by means of the public defender or a court appointed attorney;

Claims by the state and its political subdivisions for costs incurred in the investigation of the crime and the prosecution and trial of the criminally responsible person;

Claims by the victim or victims of the criminally responsible person pursuant to §

12-25.1-4

;

Claims by the state pursuant to §

12-25-26

;

Civil judgments in favor of the victim or victims of the criminally responsible person;

After claims arising under paragraphs (i) — (v) of this subdivision have been resolved and the statute of limitations for the claims has expired, one-half (1/2) of the remainder of the funds attributable to a specific criminally responsible person shall be transferred to the violent crimes indemnity fund established by §

12-25-28

;

Claims by other creditors of the criminally responsible person; and

Claims by the criminally responsible person or persons claiming through him or her.

Claims against the criminal royalties fund shall be made against the portion of the fund attributable to the specific criminally responsible person and not against the fund as a whole. No payment shall be made out of the fund when that payment would be in derogation of claims, either present or pending, entitled to a higher priority under this subsection. The general treasurer may bring an action of interpleader or an action for a declaratory judgment where he or she cannot determine the priority of claims and the proper disposition of funds. Monies in the fund shall not be subject to execution, levy, attachment, or lien except in accordance with the priorities set forth in this subsection. Any party aggrieved by a final determination and order of the general treasurer arising from his administration of the criminal royalties fund may seek judicial review of the decision pursuant to The Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 24.

12-25.1-4.
Awards of compensation from the criminal royalties fund.

A victim, his or her guardian, or in the case of a deceased victim, his or her legal representative, within three (3) years of the last payment to or recovery by the criminal royalties fund of monies attributable to the criminally responsible person whose portion of the fund is to be charged, may petition the court for compensation from that portion of the fund. Notice of the action shall be accorded the criminally responsible person in the manner and in the form prescribed by the court after filing of the petition. In the event that the whereabouts of the criminally responsible person are neither known nor discoverable through diligent and reasonable inquiry, the circumstance shall be made a matter of record by affidavit to the court. The criminally responsible person whose portion of the fund is to be charged shall have the right to contest any petition pursuant to this section.

No award of compensation may be entered unless the court, sitting without a jury, finds that:

The victim did suffer personal injury or loss of property as a result of conduct in this state in perpetration of a criminal offense by the criminally responsible person whose portion of the fund is to be charged;

That the victim was not a co-conspirator with or an accessory to the criminally responsible person in the perpetration of the criminal offense;

That the person whose portion of the fund is to be charged has been convicted of the criminal offense or otherwise determined to be the criminally responsible person within the meaning of this chapter; and

The portion of the criminal royalties fund sought to be charged is attributable to the criminally responsible person shown to have caused the victim’s personal injury.

The court may award compensation:

To or on behalf of the victim, or his or her guardian;

In the case of the personal injury of the victim, where the compensation is for pecuniary loss suffered or expenses incurred by any person responsible for the maintenance of the victim, to that person; or

In the case of the death of the victim, to or for the benefit of the dependents or closest relative of the deceased victim, or any one or more of those dependents, or to the legal representative of the victim.

An award of compensation shall be limited to:

Expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the personal injury or death of the victim;

Pecuniary loss to the personally injured victim or the dependents of the deceased victim;

Pain and suffering of the personally injured victim;

Any other pecuniary loss resulting from the personal injury or death of the victim, the amount of which the court finds upon the evidence to be reasonable and necessary; and

The amount of the fair market value of the lost or stolen property.

In determining the amount of an award, the court may consider any circumstances it determines to be relevant, including the behavior of the victim which directly or indirectly contributed to his or her injury or death or loss of property, unless the injury or death resulted from the victim’s lawful attempt to prevent the commission of a crime or to apprehend a criminally responsible person. No interest shall be included in or added to an award of compensation under this chapter. No compensation shall be awarded if the victim was at the time of the personal injury or death or loss of property of the victim living with the criminally responsible person as his wife or her husband or in other situations, when the court, in its discretion, feels unjust enrichment to or on behalf of the criminally responsible person would result. Compensation under this chapter shall not be awarded to any victim or dependent relative or legal representative if the award would, directly or indirectly, inure to the benefit of the criminally responsible person.

Upon certification by the court, the general treasurer shall pay to the person named in the award the amount specified in it from the appropriate portion of the criminal royalties fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-4.1.
Assets available.

A victim, his or her guardian, or in the case of a deceased victim, his or her legal representative, in addition to any rights conveyed pursuant to this chapter, may seek recovery from any of the criminally responsible person’s assets. A victim may proceed against the defendant’s assets, whether or not these assets represent royalties obtained from the commercial exploitation of the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 240, § 2.

12-25.1-5.
Attorneys’ fees.

At the conclusion of the proceedings under §

12-25.1-4

, the attorney representing a claimant who has received an award of compensation shall file a statement with the court setting forth the amount of fee proposed to be charged in connection with his or her efforts and services rendered in the proceedings. After the fee information is filed by the attorney, the court shall determine whether the proposed fee is reasonable. If the court initially determines that the proposed fee is unreasonable, the court shall, upon notice to the attorney, determine the amount of a reasonable fee. Upon certification by the court to the effect that the fee has been established, the general treasurer shall pay to the attorney named in the certification the amount of the counsel fee which shall be paid from the appropriate portion of the criminal royalties fund. Any attorney who charges, demands, receives, or collects for services rendered in connection with any proceedings under this chapter any amount in excess of that allowed under this section, if any compensation is paid, shall be subject to disciplinary action and other appropriate action to be taken by the supreme court of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-6.
Return of monies to criminally responsible person.

No funds attributable to a specific alleged criminally responsible person shall be distributed unless and until that person is determined to be criminally responsible as defined in this chapter. Immediately upon the dismissal of charges or the acquittal of the person for the crime which was the subject of the commercial exploitation, all funds recovered by the general treasurer attributable to that person shall be paid to him or her together with any interest which accrued on those funds.

Subject to the disposition of all claims and pending claims which have been brought against the funds attributable to the criminally responsible person, he or she may recover the remainder of the funds pursuant to §

12-25.1-3(c)(1)(viii)

three (3) years and six (6) months following the last payment to or recovery by the general treasurer of the funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-7.
Statute of limitations.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the general or public laws with respect to the timely bringing of an action, all claims brought against the criminal royalties fund shall be brought within three (3) years of accrual or three (3) years of the last payment to or recovery by the general treasurer of funds or other compensation attributable to the criminally responsible person, whichever is later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-8.
Public notice.

The general treasurer, at least once every six (6) months for three (3) years from the date he or she receives those moneys, shall cause to have published a legal notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the state advising potential claimants that those funds are available to satisfy money judgments pursuant to this chapter. The general treasurer may, in his or her discretion, provide for any additional notice that he or she deems necessary. The expenses of the advertisements shall be charged against the appropriate portion of the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-9.
Legal expenses of criminally responsible person.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the general treasurer shall make payments from the portion of the criminal royalties fund attributable to a criminally responsible person to that person upon order of the court after a showing that the monies shall be used exclusively for the purpose of retaining legal representation at any stage of the criminal proceedings against the person with respect to the events or conduct being the subject of the commercial exploitation giving rise to the monies paid to or recovered by the criminal royalties fund; provided, that the total of all payments made pursuant to this section shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total monies in the applicable portion of the criminal royalties fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-10.
Subterfuge.

Any action taken by or on behalf of any criminally responsible person to circumvent, impede, or frustrate the purpose of this chapter shall be null and void.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-11.
Failure to comply.

Every person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity which enters into a contract within the scope of §

12-25.1-3

but fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter shall be liable to the criminal royalties fund for double the amount which the person or entity should have paid over to the general treasurer pursuant to the contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.

12-25.1-12.
Severability.

If any of the provisions of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 328, § 1.